South Dakota, session 2026, HB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $402,000,000 in federal fund expenditure authority, to the
Department of Health, for implementing the rural health transformation program in this state
as authorized by the One Big Beautiful Bill Act, Pub. L. No. 119-21 (July 4, 2025).
Section 2. The Department of Health shall submit quarterly expense reports to the
Department of Legislative Audit and the Legislative Research Council listing expenditures, by
rural health transformation program initiative, using the authority appropriated in this Act
until the authority is exhausted.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Health shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by
October 30, 2027, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.630.13 2 1044
An Act to make an appropriation to implement the rural health transformation program, and
to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1044
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1044 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1044 ENROLLED